Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.150

Treasurer—Bond—Duties—Funds.

The commission shall appoint a treasurer who shall file with it a fidelity bond executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state, in favor of the commission and the state, in the penal sum of fifty thousand dollars, conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or her duties and strict accounting of all funds of the commission.

All money received by the commission, or any other state official from the assessment herein levied, shall be paid to the treasurer, deposited in such banks as the commission may designate, and disbursed by order of the commission. None of the provisions of RCW 43.01.050 shall apply to money collected under this chapter.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6023; 1961 c 11 s 15.24.150. Prior: 1937 c 195 s 6; RRS s 2874-6.]